Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. Attorney General
§ 9-1-627.
Authority to compile, disseminate and exchange information; immunity; access to information limited; security precautions.

Any law enforcement officer, the attorney general and his deputies and assistants, and any prosecuting attorney may:

Take fingerprints, photographs and other information relating to criminal identification;

Compile reports or other documents in writing containing criminal intelligence information, including statements taken from police informants and reports based on the investigation and surveillance of suspected criminal activity;

Disseminate and exchange criminal identification data and criminal intelligence information among themselves and among law enforcement agencies of other states, tribes or of the federal government.

A person authorized under this section to disseminate or exchange information is not civilly or criminally liable for contributing or for disseminating to authorized persons criminal identification data or criminal intelligence information.

Access to criminal identification and intelligence information is available to law enforcement agencies, the state board of parole and department of corrections as provided by W.S.

7-13-401

through

7-13-411

, any agency designated for the purpose provided by W.S.

14-6-227

and the department of family services. Each agency which has that information shall take reasonable security precautions to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to it in accordance with rules and procedures established by the division. The rules and procedures may be varied between agencies, depending upon the division’s determination of the agency’s use of the criminal identification and intelligence information and the adequacy of the agency’s security of the information provided by the division under this section.

Access to criminal history record information is available to the Wyoming gaming commission as provided for by law. The commission shall take reasonable security precautions to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to criminal history record information in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Wyoming division of criminal investigation. For the purpose of this subsection “criminal history record information” means information, records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies on individuals for the purpose of identifying criminal offenders consisting of identifiable descriptions of the offenders and notations or a summary of arrests, detentions, indictments, information, pre-trial proceedings, nature and disposition of criminal charges, sentencing, rehabilitation, incarceration, correctional supervision and release. Criminal history record information is limited to information recorded as the result of the initiation of criminal proceedings. It does not include intelligence data, analytical prosecutorial files, investigative reports and files of statistical records and reports in which individual identities are not ascertainable.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.27; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-568; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 157, § 2; ch. 163, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2006, ch. 26, § 1; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “11-25-104(k)” for “11-25-104(j)” in (d).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iii), added “, tribes” following “agencies of other states.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 114, § 2, in (d) substituted “Wyoming gaming commission” for “Wyoming pari-mutuel commission” and “provided for by law” for “provided by W.S. 11-25-104(k).”

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Accused's right to discovery or inspection of “rap sheets” or similar police records about prosecution witnesses, 95 ALR3d 832.

§§ 9-1-628 through 9-1-631.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 32, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1, related to cooperation of criminal identification division with other state agencies, advisory council to criminal identification division, and planning committee on criminal administration.

§ 9-1-632.
Wyoming law enforcement academy; created; location.

The Wyoming law enforcement academy is created under the office of the attorney general.

The academy shall be located in Douglas, Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-598; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-633.
Wyoming law enforcement academy; director; appointment; term; qualifications; employees; salaries; curriculum and training programs; fees; disposition.

A director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy shall be appointed by the attorney general with the consent of the governor. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general. He shall have administrative and operational experience in criminal justice and such other qualifications as are satisfactory to the attorney general.

The director may employ assistants, instructors and other personnel as approved by the attorney general with the consent of the governor. The attorney general may appoint the director as a peace officer, if qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

. The director may appoint full-time staff instructors who qualify pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

to perform as peace officers. Persons appointed as peace officers pursuant to this subsection shall be considered peace officers only:

When on law enforcement academy property;

When providing security for state personnel or at designated state events or activities;

When providing security for designated individuals on or about state property; or

While acting pursuant to W.S.

7-2-106

.

The director and staff shall receive salaries fixed by the Wyoming personnel division, department of administration and information.

The academy shall provide education in law enforcement related areas to Wyoming peace officers. The attorney general shall be assisted by, and shall have the curriculum and training programs at the academy evaluated by the Wyoming peace officer standards and training commission.

The director shall charge and collect a fee of at least fifteen dollars ($15.00) per student per day for advanced courses which exceed the basic statutory requirements. The director shall waive the fees for the division of criminal investigation and may waive the fees for offices, departments or agencies which allow their officers to instruct at the academy at no charge.

The director shall charge and collect a fee sufficient to cover actual direct and indirect costs of coroner basic courses. The fee shall be at least three hundred dollars ($300.00) per student attending the coroner basic courses.

The director may allow the use of academy facilities by governmental agencies other than law enforcement and shall charge a fee based on actual direct and indirect costs for that use.

No fees shall be charged for:

Peace officer basic courses;

Detention officer basic courses;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 148, § 2.

To the extent space is available and under policies established by the director and approved by the attorney general, the academy may permit persons other than peace officers to attend training courses it offers and to charge a fee to recover, at a minimum, the cost of the training and all services provided in conjunction therewith. Prior to admittance a person shall meet all requirements of W.S. 9-1-704(b)(i) through (viii) providing for any background investigation and examinations at the cost of the applicant.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 120, § 3.

The director shall establish an outreach training services program whereby certain updates, specialized or advanced training courses may be provided locally. The director may seek assistance from the appropriate entities in determining the amount and the specific courses to be offered under the program. The director shall charge and collect a fee to cover the development, delivery and material costs of the training offered by the program.

Revenues received pursuant to subsections (e), (f), (g), (j) and (m) of this section and W.S.

9-1-635

and 31-5-1201(h) shall be credited to an account in the enterprise fund and are continuously appropriated to the attorney general to be expended for the actual direct and indirect costs of providing the services for which the revenues are generated.

As used in this section “full-time staff instructor” means an instructor employed at the academy who works on a yearly basis, with a normal work week of thirty-two (32) or more hours.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-599; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 170, § 1; 1991, ch. 192, § 1; 1992, ch. 29, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, § 307; 1996, ch. 1, § 309; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 1998, ch. 30, § 312; 1999, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 118, § 1; ch. 120, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 45, § 1; 2018 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment

rewrote (b)(iv), which formerly read: “While responding to requests to assist other peace officers performing their official duties.”

Laws 2004, ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (n), inserted “and 31-5-1201(h)” following “W.S.

9-1-635

” and substituted “for which the revenues are generated” for “generating the revenues” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-634.
Academy to provide coroner training; certification of completion.

The director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy shall provide at the academy or other location within the state a basic coroner’s course of at least forty (40) hours. The course shall comply with standards promulgated by the peace officers standards and training commission and the board of coroner standards.

The executive director of the peace officers standards and training commission shall issue an appropriate certificate of completion to any coroner or deputy coroner who completes a coroner training course offered by the academy or which the board of coroner standards has certified as meeting board standards.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 1; 1987, ch. 152, § 1; 1990, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 70, § 1; 2006, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to executive director of peace officer standards and training commission, see §

9-1-703

.

As to board of coroner standards, see §

7-4-211

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), substituted “shall” for “may” and inserted “at least.”

§ 9-1-635.
Dispatcher training course; certificate upon completion; fees.

The director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy or other training agency may provide at the academy or other location within the state a basic dispatcher course. The course shall comply with standards promulgated by the peace officers standards and training commission.

The director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy or other training agency shall issue an appropriate certificate of course completion to any dispatcher who completes the required training.

Fees charged for dispatcher courses held at the Wyoming law enforcement academy shall be the same as those charged for peace officer courses.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 109, § 1.

§ 9-1-636.
Division of victim services; created; appointment of director and deputy director; administrative and clerical employees; definitions.

The division of victim services is created within the office of the attorney general.

With the approval of the governor, the attorney general shall appoint a director who is the chief administrative officer of the division. The director is responsible to the attorney general for the operation of the division and shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general.

With the consent of the attorney general and the governor, and subject to legislative appropriation, the director may:

Appoint a deputy director who shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general and shall perform duties as assigned by the director;

Employ administrative and other specialized personnel necessary to carry out the functions of the division.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the victim services division advisory board;

“Crisis intervention services for victims of family violence and sexual assault” means emergency intervention, information, referral services and medical, legal and social services advocacy;

“Director” means the director of the division;

“Division” means the victim services division within the office of the attorney general;

“Domestic abuse” means as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iii);

“Household member” means as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iv);

through (G) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 173, § 2.

“Sexual assault” means any act made criminal under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

,

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

and

6-4-402

;

“Shelter services” means temporary refuge, offered on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7) day per week basis to victims of domestic and family violence and sexual assault and their children;

“This act” means W.S.

9-1-636

through

9-1-638

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 1; 2003, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 159, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (d)(vii), inserted “6-2-314 through

6-2-317

and,” and deleted “and

14-3-105

” at the end of the sentence.

§ 9-1-637.
Division of victim services; duties of director.

The director shall:

Supervise and direct all activities of the division;

Report to the attorney general regarding all functions of the division;

Serve as the state’s representative on local, state and national organizations dealing with victim services;

Serve as the state’s liaison with local governmental entities and community service providers to facilitate cooperative efforts to provide victim services;

Consult and cooperate with other departments and agencies involved in victim services;

Provide public information and education concerning issues relating to victims;

Receive and take appropriate action to resolve complaints regarding violations of rights afforded to victims under the Victims Bill of Rights, W.S.

1-40-201

through

1-40-210

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-638.
Division of victim services; duties and responsibilities.

The division of victim services shall:

Administer a comprehensive statewide plan that provides victim services including, but not limited to, a state program of shelter services for victims of domestic abuse and sexual assault;

Provide services for victims of crime consistent with current federal funding levels and surcharge funds;

Review and evaluate all programs receiving appropriated funds;

Coordinate and provide training, grant application assistance and other support for community based programs and services for victims;

Establish minimum program standards and uniform reporting procedures for community based services and programs for victims supported by state funds and state administered federal funds, including a requirement that each provider of community based services and programs submit an annual unduplicated count of the number of victims it served in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the division;

Enter into contracts for victim services with public or private agencies. The division shall not contract with any entity that is not in substantial compliance with the standards and guidelines promulgated by the division. On all contracts that have not been entered into by competitive bidding, the director shall record on the contract why competitive bidding was not considered;

Subject to the approval of the attorney general, promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the duties and responsibilities assigned to the division.

Review division of criminal investigation reports from the missing person clearinghouse, as provided in W.S. 9-1-624(a)(v), and coordinate with members of the judiciary, prosecutors, defense counsel, law enforcement and others to provide training on crimes related to missing and murdered persons in the state of Wyoming, including Indian missing and murdered persons.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 1; 1999, ch. 136, § 1; 2009, ch. 194, § 1; 2012, ch. 31, § 1; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

added “including a requirement that such community based services and providers submit an annual unduplicated count of the number of victims served in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the division.”

Laws 2009 ch. 194, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “each provider of” for “such,” substituted “programs” for “providers” before “submit an annual,” and added “it” after “number of victims.”

Laws 2012, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-639.
Attorney general; funds accounting; reporting requirements.

There is created a separate account which the attorney general shall use to account for:

Monies the attorney general administers as trustee pursuant to law or agreement which restricts the use of the money to a specified purpose; and

Monies which the attorney general holds and disburses as an agent or attorney in fact, which shall include but not be limited to class action litigation recoveries that are to be distributed to any person or business organization, local government pass-through monies, and contingent fee contracts to be distributed to contract attorneys.

All recoveries, including consumer protection recoveries and class action recoveries, where the attorney general is not designated as the administrator, the trustee or the agent for distribution purposes, shall be deposited into the general fund after deducting litigation costs reimbursed to the attorney general. For purposes of this subsection “litigation costs” shall include expert witness fees, filing fees, reporter costs, other witness fees and costs associated with depositions and discovery.

Monies deposited to the account under subsection (a) of this section may be expended in accordance with W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii).

Monies deposited into the account under subsection (a) of this section and not otherwise expended under subsection (c) of this section may be expended by the attorney general in accordance with the purposes for which the monies were received. Monies received by the attorney general for reimbursement of litigation expenses under subsection (b) of this section are continuously appropriated to the attorney general to be expended for the costs of providing the litigation services rendered to collect the recovered monies.

Not later than November 1 of each year, the attorney general shall report to the joint appropriations interim committee on the expenditure of monies received pursuant to this section, W.S.

9-1-633

,

9-1-635

,

9-1-702

and

9-2-1005

. The report shall include an account of the monies in the accounts created in this section for the last fiscal year.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 120, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” in (a); substituted “account” for “trust and agency fund” in (c) and (d); and substituted “accounts created in this section” for “trust and agency account and the enterprise account” in (e).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-1-640.
Administrative subpoena authority for investigations of child exploitation.

In any investigation relating to a state offense involving sexual exploitation of children under W.S.

6-4-303

, and upon reasonable cause to believe that an Internet service account has been used in the exploitation or attempted exploitation of children, the attorney general or his chief deputy may issue in writing and cause to be served a subpoena requiring the production and testimony described in subsection (b) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a subpoena issued under this section may require the production of any records or other documentation relevant to the investigation including:

Electronic mail address;

Internet username;

Internet protocol address;

Name of account holder;

Billing and service address;

Telephone number;

Account status;

Method of access to the Internet;

Automatic number identification records if access is by modem.

The provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall not disclose the following except pursuant to a warrant:

In-transit electronic communications;

Account memberships related to Internet groups, newsgroups, mailing lists or specific areas of interest;

Account passwords;

Account content to include:

Electronic mail in any form;

Address books or contact/“buddy” lists;

Financial records;

Internet proxy content or “Web surfing” history;

Files or other digital documents stored within the account or pursuant to use of the account.

At any time before the return date specified on the subpoena, the person summoned may, in the district court in which the person resides or does business, petition for an order modifying or setting aside the subpoena, or a prohibition of disclosure by a court.

A subpoena under this section shall describe the objects required to be produced and shall prescribe a return date within a reasonable period of time within which the objects can be assembled and made available.

If no case or proceeding arises from the production of records or other documentation pursuant to this section within a reasonable time after those records or documentation are produced, the attorney general shall either destroy the records and documentation or return them to the person who produced them.

A subpoena issued under this section may be served by any person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and who is designated in the subpoena to serve it. Service upon a natural person may be made by personal delivery of the subpoena to him. Service may be made upon a corporation or partnership or other unincorporated association which is subject to suit under the common name, by delivering the subpoena to an officer, to a managing or general agent, or to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process. The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena together with a true copy thereof shall be proof of service.

The attorney general shall annually report the following information to the joint judiciary interim committee no later than February 1 for the preceding calendar year:

The number of requests for administrative subpoenas made under this section;

The number of administrative subpoenas issued under this section;

The number of administrative subpoenas issued under this section that were contested;

The number of administrative subpoenas issued under this section that were suppressed;

The number of search warrants that were issued as a consequence of the issuance of an administrative subpoena under this section;

The number of individuals who were prosecuted under W.S.

6-4-303

following the issuance of an administrative subpoena under this section.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section any information, records or data reported or obtained pursuant to subpoena under this section shall remain confidential and shall not be further disclosed unless in connection with a criminal case related to the subpoenaed materials.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 66, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 66, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.